Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 9, Chapter 366, O.S.L.


2024, as amended by Section 3, Chapter 187, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S.


Supp. 2025, Section 20I), is amended to read as follows:


Section 20I. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or


after January 1, 2026, Class B4 shall include the following criminal


offenses:

Req. No. 3162 Page 1


1. Concealing the birth or death of a child, as provided for in


Section 53 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


2. Assault, battery, or assault and battery with a sharp or


dangerous weapon, as provided for in Section 645 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


3. Robbery in the second degree, as provided for in Section 799


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


4. Neglecting a vulnerable adult, as provided for in subsection


A of Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


5. Malicious harassment of another person based on that


person’s race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, or


disability, as provided for in Section 850 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


6. Abandonment of a child under ten (10) years of age, as


provided for in Section 851 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


7. Abandonment of a wife or child under fifteen (15) years of


age, as provided for in Section 853 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


8. Second or subsequent conviction for causing, aiding,


abetting, encouraging, soliciting, or recruiting a minor to


participate, join, or associate with a criminal street gang, as


provided for in subsection E of Section 856 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;

Req. No. 3162 Page 2


9. Incest, as provided for in Section 885 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


10. Crime against nature, as provided for in Section 886 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


11. Taking or enticing away any child under sixteen (16) years


of age with the intent to detain or conceal such child, as provided


for in Section 891 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


12. Indecent exposure, as provided for in paragraph 1 of


subsection A of Section 1021 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


13. Procuring, counseling, or assisting another to commit an


act of indecent exposure, as provided for in paragraph 2 of


subsection A of Section 1021 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


14. Preparing, publishing, selling, distributing, downloading


on a computer, or exhibiting obscene material or child pornography


sexual abuse material, as provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection


A of Section 1021 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


15. Preparing, selling, giving, loaning, distributing, or


exhibiting any type of obscene material or child pornography sexual


abuse material, as provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of


Section 1021 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


16. Operating, owning, or maintaining a house of prostitution,


soliciting, enticing, or procuring another for prostitution, or

Req. No. 3162 Page 3


transporting or assisting in the transport of another for


prostitution purposes, as provided for in Section 1028 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


17. Engaging in prostitution or soliciting, inducing, enticing,


or procuring another to commit an act of prostitution, as provided


for in subsection A of Section 1029 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


18. Purchasing, selling, or distributing obscene material or


child pornography sexual abuse material, as provided for in Section


1040.13 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


19. Encouraging, offering, or soliciting sexual conduct with a


minor by use of technology, as provided for in Section 1040.13a of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


20. Promoting a pyramid promotional scheme, as provided for in


Section 1073 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


21. Second or subsequent offense of permitting prostitution in


any house, building, room, or premises under the control of such


person, as provided for in Section 1086 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


22. Offering or offering to secure a child under eighteen (18)


years of age for the purpose of prostitution, as provided for in


paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 1087 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;



Req. No. 3162 Page 4


23. Knowingly permitting the prostitution of a child under


eighteen (18) years of age by an owner, proprietor, manager,


conductor, or other person in any house, place, building, room, or


other premises under the control of such person, as provided for in


paragraph 2 of subsection B of Section 1087 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


24. Taking a woman against her will to compel her by force or


duress to marry another, as provided for in Section 1118 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


25. Abduction of a child under fifteen (15) years of age for


the purpose of marriage, concubinage, or any crime involving moral


turpitude, as provided for in Section 1119 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


26. Sexual battery, as provided for in subsection B of Section


1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


27. Indecent acts with a human corpse, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


28. Desecration of a human corpse, as provided for in Section


1161.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


29. Stalking within ten (10) years of a prior conviction for


stalking, as provided for in subsection D of Section 1173 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;



Req. No. 3162 Page 5


30. Interfering with, molesting, or assaulting firefighters in


the performance of their duties, as provided for in Section 1217 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


31. Concealment of hazardous waste, as provided for in Section


1230.7 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


32. Criminal syndicalism, as provided for in Section 1261 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


33. Sabotage, as provided for in Section 1262 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


34. Advocating or teaching criminal syndicalism or sabotage, as


provided for in Section 1263 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


35. Destroying, interfering, hindering, or tampering with real


or personal property with intent to hinder, delay, or interfere with


preparations for defense or for war, as provided for in Section


1265.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


36. Make or cause defects with any article or thing with


reasonable grounds to believe such article or thing will be used for


defense or for war, as provided for in Section 1265.3 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


37. Conspiracy to commit crimes provided in the Sabotage


Prevention Act, as provided for in Section 1265.5 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;



Req. No. 3162 Page 6


38. Terrorism hoax, as provided for in Section 1268.4 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


39. Engaging in terrorist activity by manufacturing, sending,


delivering, or possessing any toxic, noxious, or lethal substances,


chemical, biological, or nuclear materials, as provided for in


Section 1268.6 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


40. Conducting or attempting to conduct financial transactions


involving property related to terrorism, as provided for in Section


1268.7 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


41. Using a money services business or an electronic funds


transfer in violation of the Oklahoma Antiterrorism Act, as provided


for in Section 1268.8 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this


title;


42. Possession of a firearm by a convicted felon, as provided


for in subsection A of Section 1283 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


43. Possession of a firearm by a person serving a term of


probation for a felony or who is subject to supervision, probation,


parole, or inmate status, as provided for in subsection C D of


Section 1283 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


44. Possession of a firearm by a person previously adjudicated


as a delinquent child or youthful offender, as provided for in


subsection D E of Section 1283 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;

Req. No. 3162 Page 7


45. Possession of a firearm by a person who is an alien


illegally or unlawfully in the United States, as provided for in


subsection E F of Section 1283 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


46. Allowing a convicted felon, adjudicated delinquent, or


youthful offender to possess a pistol authorized for use under the


Oklahoma Self-Defense Act by a person who has a handgun license, as


provided for in subsection F G of Section 1283 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


47. Use of a firearm or other offensive weapon while committing


a felony, as provided for in Section 1287 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


48. Pointing a firearm, as provided for in Section 1289.16 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


49. Manufacturing, importing, or selling restricted bullets, as


provided for in Section 1289.20 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


50. Possessing, carrying, or using or attempting to use against


another person any restricted bullets, as provided for in Section


1289.21 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


51. Committing a felony while wearing body armor, as provided


for in Section 1289.26 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this


title;



Req. No. 3162 Page 8


52. Carrying a stolen handgun, as provided for in subsection B


of Section 1290.21 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


53. Incitement to riot, as provided for in Section 1320.2 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


54. Malicious destruction or damage to real or personal


property or malicious injury to another during a state of emergency,


as provided for in Section 1321.7 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


55. Participating in a riot during a state of emergency, as


provided for in subsection A of Section 1321.8 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


56. Causing an innocent or irresponsible person to engage in a


riot, as provided for in subsection E of Section 1321.8 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


57. Possession of explosives by a convicted felon, as provided


for in Section 1368 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


58. Attempting, conspiring, or endeavoring to perform an act of


violence, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1378 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


59. Devising a plan, scheme, or program of action to cause


serious bodily harm or death of another person, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 1378 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;



Req. No. 3162 Page 9


60. Endangering any human life including emergency service


personnel while committing an act of arson, as provided for in


Section 1405 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


61. Intimidating, threatening, assaulting, or battering any


driver, attendant, guard, or passenger of a bus with intent to seize


the bus, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1903 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


62. Discharging any firearm into or within any bus, terminal,


or other transportation facility, as provided for in subsection D of


Section 1903 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


63. Leaving the scene of a vehicle accident that resulted in


the death of a person, as provided for in Section 10-102.1 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


64. Second felony conviction of driving under the influence of


alcohol or other intoxicating substance, as provided for in


paragraph 3 of subsection C of Section 11-902 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


65. Causing an accident resulting in the death of another


person while operating a vehicle without a valid driver license, as


provided for in subsection C of Section 11-905 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


66. Throwing or dropping any substance at a moving vehicle, as


provided for in subsection A of Section 11-1111 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 3162 Page 10


67. Throwing or dropping any object from a bridge or overpass


with intent to damage property or injure a person, as provided for


in subsection B of Section 11-1111 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


68. Manufacturing, selling, transferring, or furnishing a


precursor substance to another with knowledge the recipient will use


such substance to unlawfully manufacture a controlled substance, as


provided for in subsection C of Section 2-328 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


69. Second or subsequent conviction for manufacturing, selling,


transferring, furnishing, or receiving a precursor substance, as


provided for in subsection D of Section 2-328 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


70. Purchasing, obtaining, possessing, manufacturing, selling,


or transferring a precursor substance without a permit or making a


false statement in an application or report, as provided for in


subsection E of Section 2-328 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


71. Selling, transferring, distributing, or dispensing any


product containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or


phenylpropanolamine to another with knowledge the purchaser will use


such product as a precursor to manufacture methamphetamine or


another controlled illegal substance, as provided for in Section 2-


333 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 3162 Page 11


72. Cultivating, producing, or knowingly permitting the


cultivation or production of any species of plants from which


controlled dangerous substances may be derived, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 2-509 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


73. Manufacturing or attempting to manufacture any controlled


dangerous substance by cooking, burning, or extracting and


converting marihuana or marihuana oil into hashish, hashish oil, or


hashish powder, as provided for in subsection H of Section 2-509 of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


74. Purchasing or possessing any quantity of pseudoephedrine by


a person who is subject to the Oklahoma Methamphetamine Offender


Registry Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section 2-701 of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


75. Using an explosive or blasting agent with the intent to


kill, injure, or intimidate a person or unlawfully damage real or


personal property, as provided for in subsection B of Section 124.8


of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. Any person convicted of a Class B4 criminal offense set


forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the


corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1272, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1272.


UNLAWFUL CARRY

Req. No. 3162 Page 12


A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall be


unlawful for any person to carry upon or about his or her person, or


in a purse or other container belonging to the person, any pistol,


revolver, shotgun, or rifle, whether loaded or unloaded, or any


blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, metal knuckles, or any other


offensive weapon, whether such weapon be concealed or unconcealed,


except this section shall not prohibit:


1. The proper use of guns and knives for self-defense, hunting,


fishing, or educational or recreational purposes;


2. The carrying or use of weapons in a manner otherwise


permitted by statute or authorized by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act;


3. The carrying, possession, and use of any weapon by a peace


officer or other person authorized by law to carry a weapon in the


performance of official duties and in compliance with the rules of


the employing agency;


4. The carrying or use of weapons in a courthouse by a district


judge, associate district judge, or special district judge within


this state, who is in possession of a valid handgun license issued


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and


whose name appears on a list maintained by the Administrative


Director of the Courts;


5. The carrying and use of firearms and other weapons provided


in this subsection when used for the purpose of living history


reenactment. For purposes of this paragraph, “living history

Req. No. 3162 Page 13


reenactment” means depiction of historical characters, scenes,


historical life, or events for entertainment, education, or


historical documentation through the wearing or use of period,


historical, antique, or vintage clothing, accessories, firearms,


weapons, and other implements of the historical period; or


6. The transporting by vehicle on a public roadway or the


carrying of a firearm, concealed or unconcealed, loaded or unloaded,


by a person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older or by a


person who is eighteen (18) years of age but not yet twenty-one (21)


years of age and the person is a member or veteran of the United


States Armed Forces, Reserves, or National Guard or was discharged


under honorable conditions from the United States Armed Forces,


Reserves, or National Guard, and the person is otherwise not


disqualified from the possession or purchase of a firearm under


state or federal law and is not carrying the firearm in furtherance


of a crime.


Except as provided in subsection subsections B and C of Section


1283 of this title, a person who has been convicted of any one of


the following offenses in this state or a violation of the


equivalent law of another state:


a. assault and battery pursuant to the provisions of


Section 644 of this title which caused serious


physical injury to the victim,



Req. No. 3162 Page 14


b. aggravated assault and battery pursuant to the


provisions of Section 646 of this title,


c. assault and battery that qualifies as domestic abuse


as defined in Section 644 of this title,


d. stalking pursuant to the provisions of Section 1173 of


this title,


e. a violation of an order issued under the Protection


from Domestic Abuse Act or a domestic abuse protection


order issued by another state, or


f. a violation relating to illegal drug use or possession


under the provisions of the Uniform Controlled


Dangerous Substances Act,


shall be prohibited from carrying a firearm under the provisions of


this paragraph. Any person who carries a firearm in the manner


provided for in this paragraph shall be prohibited from carrying the


firearm into any of the places prohibited in subsection A of Section


1277 of this title or any other place currently prohibited by law.


Nothing in this section shall modify or otherwise change where a


person may legally carry a firearm.


B. Any person convicted of violating the foregoing provision


subsection A of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 1276 of this title.





Req. No. 3162 Page 15


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1283, as


last amended by Section 130, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1283), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1283.


CONVICTED FELONS AND DELINQUENTS


A. Except as provided in subsection subsections B and C of this


section, it shall be unlawful for any person convicted of any felony


in any court of this state or of another state or of the United


States to have in his or her possession or under his or her


immediate control, or in any vehicle which the person is operating,


or at the residence where the convicted person resides, any pistol,


imitation or homemade pistol, altered air or toy pistol, machine


gun, sawed-off shotgun, or sawed-off rifle, or any other firearm.


Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall,


upon conviction, be guilty of a Class B4 felony offense.


B. Any person who has previously been convicted of a nonviolent


felony in any court of this state or of another state or of the


United States, and who has received a full and complete pardon from


the proper authority and has not been convicted of any other felony


offense which has not been pardoned, shall have restored the right


to possess any firearm or other weapon prohibited by subsection A of


this section, the right to apply for and carry a handgun, concealed


or unconcealed, pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-


Defense Act or as otherwise permitted by law, and have the right to

Req. No. 3162 Page 16


perform the duties of a peace officer, gunsmith, and for firearms


repair, and any other profession that requires possession, carry, or


transportation of a firearm.


C. Any person who:


1. Has previously been convicted of a nonviolent felony in any


court of this state or of another state of the United States; and


2. Has completed the entirety of the sentence imposed for the


offense and has no additional misdemeanor or felony convictions or


charges pending for a period of five (5) years since the completion


of the sentence,


shall have restored the right to possess, carry, or transport any


firearm, may apply for and carry a handgun, concealed or


unconcealed, pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense


Act or as otherwise permitted by law, and shall have the right to


perform any other duty that requires possession, carry, or


transportation of a firearm.


D. It shall be unlawful for any person serving a term of


probation for any felony in any court of this state or of another


state or of the United States or under the jurisdiction of any


alternative court program to have in his or her possession or under


his or her immediate control, or at his or her residence, or in any


passenger vehicle which the person is operating, any pistol, shotgun


or rifle including any imitation or homemade pistol, altered air or


toy pistol, toy shotgun, or toy rifle, while such person is subject

Req. No. 3162 Page 17


to supervision, probation, parole, or inmate status. Any person who


violates the provisions of this subsection shall, upon conviction,


be guilty of a Class B4 felony offense.


D. E. It shall be unlawful for any person previously


adjudicated as a delinquent child or a youthful offender for the


commission of an offense, which would have constituted a felony


offense if committed by an adult, to have in the possession of the


person or under the immediate control of the person, or have in any


vehicle which he or she is driving, or at the residence of the


person, any pistol, imitation or homemade pistol, altered air or toy


pistol, machine gun, sawed-off shotgun or sawed-off rifle, or any


other dangerous or deadly firearm within ten (10) years after such


adjudication; provided, that nothing in this subsection shall be


construed to prohibit the placement of the person in a home with a


full-time duly appointed peace officer who is certified by the


Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET) pursuant


to the provisions of Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection


shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class B4 felony offense.


E. F. It shall be unlawful for any person who is an alien


illegally or unlawfully in the United States to have in the


possession of the person or under the immediate control of the


person, or in any vehicle the person is operating, or at the


residence where the person resides, any pistol, imitation or

Req. No. 3162 Page 18


homemade pistol, altered air or toy pistol, shotgun, rifle, or any


other dangerous or deadly firearm; provided, that nothing in this


subsection applies to prohibit the transport or detention of the


person by law enforcement officers or federal immigration


authorities. Any person who violates the provisions of this


subsection shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class B4 felony


offense punishable by a fine of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00).


F. G. Any person having been issued a handgun license pursuant


to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and who knowingly


or intentionally allows a convicted felon or adjudicated delinquent


or a youthful offender as prohibited by the provisions of subsection


A, C, D, or D E of this section to possess or have control of any


firearm authorized by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of a Class B4 felony offense punishable by a


fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). In addition,


the person shall have the handgun license revoked by the Oklahoma


State Bureau of Investigation after a hearing and determination that


the person has violated the provisions of this section.


G. H. Any convicted or adjudicated person violating the


provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


felony punishable as provided in Section 1284 of this title.


H. I. For purposes of this section, “sawed-off shotgun”:





Req. No. 3162 Page 19


1. “Sawed-off shotgun” or “sawed-off rifle” shall mean means


any shotgun or rifle of which the barrel or barrels have been


illegally shortened in length.


I. For purposes of this section, “altered toy pistol” shall


mean;


2. “Altered-toy pistol” means any toy weapon which has been


altered from its original manufactured state to resemble a real


weapon.


J. For purposes of this section, “altered air pistol” shall


mean;


3. “Altered air pistol” means any air pistol manufactured to


propel projectiles by air pressure which has been altered from its


original manufactured state.


K. For purposes of this section, “alternative court program”


shall mean; and


4. “Alternative court program” means any drug court, Anna


McBride or mental health court, DUI court or veterans court.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.10, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1290.10.


MANDATORY PRECLUSIONS


In addition to the requirements stated in Section 1290.9 of this


title, the conditions stated in this section shall preclude a person


from eligibility for a handgun license pursuant to the provisions of

Req. No. 3162 Page 20


the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act. The occurrence of any one of the


following conditions shall deny the person the right to have a


handgun license pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-


Defense Act. Prohibited conditions are:


1. Ineligible Ineligibility to possess a pistol due to any


felony conviction or adjudication as a delinquent as provided by


Section 1283 of this title, except as provided in subsection


subsections B and C of Section 1283 of this title;


2. Any felony conviction pursuant to any law of another state,


a felony conviction pursuant to any provision of the United States


Code, or any conviction pursuant to the laws of any foreign country,


provided such foreign conviction would constitute a felony offense


in this state if the offense had been committed in this state,


except as provided in subsection subsections B and C of Section 1283


of this title;


3. Adjudication as a mentally incompetent person pursuant to


the provisions of the Oklahoma Mental Health Law, or an adjudication


of incompetency entered in another state pursuant to any provision


of law of that state, unless the person has been granted relief from


the disqualifying disability pursuant to Section 1290.27 of this


title;


4. Any false or misleading statement on the application for a


handgun license as provided by paragraph 5 of subsection A of


Section 1290.12 of this title;

Req. No. 3162 Page 21


5. Conviction of any one of the following misdemeanor offenses


in this state or in any other state:


a. any assault and battery which caused serious physical


injury to the victim, or any second or subsequent


assault and battery conviction,


b. any aggravated assault and battery,


c. any stalking pursuant to Section 1173 of this title,


or a similar law of another state,


d. a violation relating to the Protection from Domestic


Abuse Act or any violation of a victim protection


order of another state,


e. any conviction relating to illegal drug use or


possession, or


f. an act of domestic abuse as defined by Section 644 of


this title or an act of domestic assault and battery


or any comparable acts under the laws of another


state.


The preclusive period for a misdemeanor conviction related to


illegal drug use or possession shall be ten (10) years from the date


of completion of a sentence. For purposes of this subsection, “date


of completion of a sentence” shall mean the day an offender


completes all incarceration, probation, and parole pertaining to


such sentence;



Req. No. 3162 Page 22


6. An attempted suicide or other condition relating to or


indicating mental instability or an unsound mind which occurred


within the preceding ten-year period from the date of the


application for a license to carry a concealed firearm or that


occurs during the period of licensure;


7. Currently undergoing treatment for a mental illness,


condition, or disorder. For purposes of this paragraph, “currently


undergoing treatment for a mental illness, condition, or disorder”


means the person has been diagnosed by a licensed physician as being


afflicted with a substantial disorder of thought, mood, perception,


psychological orientation, or memory that significantly impairs


judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to


meet the ordinary demands of life;


8. Significant character defects of the applicant as evidenced


by a criminal record indicating habitual criminal activity;


9. Ineligible Ineligibility to possess a pistol due to any


provision of law of this state or the United States Code, except as


provided in subsection subsections B and C of Section 1283 of this


title;


10. Failure to pay an assessed fine or surrender the handgun


license as required by a decision by the administrative hearing


examiner pursuant to authority of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act;


11. Being subject to an outstanding felony warrant issued in


this state or another state or the United States; or

Req. No. 3162 Page 23


12. Adjudication as a delinquent as provided by Section 1283 of


this title, except as provided in subsection subsections B and C of


Section 1283 of this title.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3162 CN 1/15/2026 12:29:27 PM





































Req. No. 3162 Page 24